Utah statutes.
13-50-203.   Required provisions.

A written contract between a person and a residential contractor for the performance of repair work on a residential building shall:

(1)  include a notice of the person's right to cancel the contract, as described in Section 13-50-202, that is in substantially the following form:

"Utah Code Section 13-50-202 provides that if, when you signed this contract, the residential contractor knew or should have known that you intended that all or part of the contract would be paid with proceeds of a property and casualty insurance policy, you may cancel this contract within five business days after the day on which you receive written notification from your property and casualty insurer that your claim, or a portion of your claim, has been denied";

(2)  state the mailing address where the residential contractor receives written notice; and

(3)  include a detachable copy of a notice of cancellation that is in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE OF CANCELLATION

If your property and casualty insurer denies your claim, or a portion of your claim, to pay for the repair work to be provided under this contract, you may cancel the contract by mailing or delivering a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice or any other written cancellation notice to ______ (name of residential contractor) at ______ (address where residential contractor receives notices) any time within five business days after the day on which you receive written notice from your property and casualty insurer that your claim, or a portion of your claim, for coverage of the repair services described in this contract has been denied.  If you cancel, any payments made by you under the contract will be returned within 10 business days after the day on which the residential contractor receives your written cancellation notice, except that the residential contractor may retain or collect the reasonable value of any repair work actually performed, if you expressly instructed the residential contractor to perform the repair work without waiting for notice of coverage from your property and casualty insurer.

I HEREBY CANCEL THIS TRANSACTION.

Dated_____________

Signature_____________________"



Enacted by Chapter 160, 2013 General Session

